th: ประเภทขั้วต่อ 2: 3.5 มม. (aux); 6.35 มม. (1/4 นิ้ว); BNC; โคแอกเซียล (F-type); คอมโพเนนต์ RCA; คอมโพสิต RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; สายไลท์นิง; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-Type; ออปติคัล (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος συνδετήρα 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 ίντσας); BNC; Ομοαξονικό (τύπου F); Συνιστώσα RCA; Σύνθετο RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Τύπου N; Οπτικό (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip conector 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 inch); BNC; Coaxial (tip F); Component RCA; Compozit RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Fulger; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Tip N; Optic (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip A; USB tip B; USB tip C; VGA; XLR; Altele
nb: Kontakttype 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4-tomme); BNC; Koaksial (F-type); Komponent RCA; Kompositt RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-type; Optisk (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Annet
ko: 커넥터 2 유형: 3.5 mm (aux); 6.35 mm (1/4인치); BNC; 동축 (F타입); 컴포넌트 RCA; 컴포지트 RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; 디스플레이포트; HDMI; Lightning; 마이크로 HDMI; 미니 디스플레이포트; 미니 HDMI; N 타입; 광학 (토스링크); SATA; SCART; 썬더볼트; USB 마이크로-B; USB 미니-B; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-B; USB 타입-C; VGA; XLR; 기타
ja: コネクター2タイプ: 3.5mm（AUX）; 6.35mm（1/4インチ）; BNC; 同軸（F型）; コンポーネントRCA; コンポジットRCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N型; 光デジタル（Toslink）; SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; その他
fi: Liittimen 2 tyyppi: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4-tuuma); BNC; Koaksiaali (F-tyyppi); Komponentti-RCA; Komposiitti-RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-tyypin; Optinen (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB micro-B; USB mini-B; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; VGA; XLR; Muu
hu: 2. csatlakozó típusa: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 hüvelyk); BNC; Koaxiális (F-típus); Komponens RCA; Kompozit RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-típusú; Optikai (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-A; USB-B; USB-C; VGA; XLR; Egyéb
zh-TW: 連接器 2 類型: 3.5 mm（aux）; 6.35 mm（1/4 吋）; BNC; 同軸（F 型）; 色差 RCA; 複合 RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning 傳輸線; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N 型; 光纖 (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; 其他
fr: Type de connecteur 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 pouce); BNC; Coaxial (type F); RCA composantes; RCA composite; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Type N; Optique (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type A; USB type B; USB type C; VGA; XLR; Autre
cs: Typ konektoru 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 palce); BNC; Koaxiální (typ F); Komponentní RCA; Kompozitní RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-typ; Optický (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ A; USB typ B; USB typ C; VGA; XLR; Jiné
lt-LT: 2-osios jungties tipas: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 colio); BNC; Bendraašis (F tipo); Komponentinis RCA; Kompozitinis RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Apšvietimo; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N tipo; Optinis (Toslink); SATA; SCART; „Thunderbolt“; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A tipo; USB B tipo; USB C tipo; VGA; XLR; Kita
hr-HR: Tip konektora 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 inča); BNC; Koaksijalni (F-tip); Komponentni RCA; Kompozitni RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Osvjetljenje; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-tip; Optički (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tip-C; VGA; XLR; Ostalo
vi: Loại đầu nối 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4-inch); BNC; Đồng trục (loại F); RCA thành phần; RCA composite; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro hdmi; Mini DisplayPort; Mini hdmi; N-Type; Quang học (toslink); Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Khác
sv: Kontakttyp 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 tum); BNC; Koaxial (F-typ); Komponent-RCA; Komposit-RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Belysning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-typ; Optisk (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ-A; USB typ-B; USB typ-C; VGA; XLR; Övrigt
nl: Type connector 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4-inch); BNC; Coaxiaal (F-type); Component RCA; Composiet RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-type; Optisch (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Andere
tr: Konnektör 2 tipi: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 inç); BNC; Koaksiyel (F-tipi); Komponent RCA; Kompozit RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Mikro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N tipi; Optik (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Tip-A; USB Tip-B; USB Tip-C; VGA; XLR; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de conector 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 polegada); BNC; Coaxial (tipo F); RCA componente; RCA composto; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Raio; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Tipo N; Óptico (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Outro
ru: Тип разъема 2: 3,5 мм (aux); 6,35 мм (1/4 дюйма); BNC; Коаксиальный (F-тип); Компонентный RCA; Композитный RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Микро HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Мини HDMI; N-тип; Оптический (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Другой
it: Tipo di connettore 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 pollice); BNC; Coassiale (tipo F); RCA component; RCA composito; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Illuminazione; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Tipo N; Ottico (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Altro
zh-CN: 连接器 2 类型: 3.5 毫米 (aux); 6.35 毫米（1/4 英寸）; BNC; 同轴（F 型）; 分量 RCA; 复合 RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; 迷你 DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N 型; 光纤 (Toslink); SATA; SCART; 雷电接口; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A 型; USB B 型; USB C 型; VGA; XLR; 其他
bg-BG: Тип на конектор 2: 3,5 мм (aux); 6,35 мм (1/4 инча); BNC; Коаксиален (F-тип); Компонентен RCA; Композитен RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Осветление; Micro HDMI; Мини DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-тип; Оптичен (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Други
pl: Typ złącza 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 cala); BNC; Koncentryczne (typ F); Komponentowe RCA; Kompozytowe RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Typu N; Optyczny (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; VGA; XLR; Inne
da: Stik 2-type: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4-tomme); BNC; Koaksial (F-type); Komponent RCA; Komposit RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lyn; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-type; Optisk (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Andet
sl-SI: Tip priključka 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 palca); BNC; Koaksialni (tip F); Komponentni RCA; Kompozitni RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-tip; Optični (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tipa C; VGA; XLR; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ konektora 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 palca); BNC; Koaxiálny (typ F); Komponentný RCA; Kompozitný RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Osvetlenie; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-Type; Optický (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; VGA; XLR; Iné
en: Connector 2 type: 3.5 mm (aux); 6.35 mm (1/4-inch); BNC; Coaxial (F-type); Component RCA; Composite RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-Type; Optical (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Other
de: Steckertyp 2: 3,5 mm (Aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 Zoll); BNC; Koaxial (F-Typ); Component RCA; Composite RCA; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; N-Typ; Optisch (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-B; USB-Typ-C; VGA; XLR; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de conector 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 pulgada); BNC; Coaxial (tipo F); RCA de componente; RCA compuesto; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Tipo N; Óptico (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de conector 2: 3,5 mm (aux); 6,35 mm (1/4 polegada); BNC; Coaxial (tipo F); RCA componente; RCA composto; DVI-D; DVI-I; DisplayPort; HDMI; Lightning; Micro HDMI; Mini DisplayPort; Mini HDMI; Tipo N; Ótico (Toslink); SATA; SCART; Thunderbolt; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Outro